Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.27.010 and 2023 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1)(a) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity who or which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, develop, move, wreck, or demolish any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in connection therewith, the installation or repair of roofing or siding, performing tree removal services, or cabinet or similar installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit except as otherwise provided in this chapter.(b) "Contractor" also includes a consultant acting as a general contractor.(c) "Contractor" also includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity covered by this subsection (1), whether or not registered as required under this chapter or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who offer to sell their property without occupying or using the structures, projects, developments, or improvements for more than one year from the date the structure, project, development, or improvement was substantially completed or abandoned. A person, firm, corporation, or other entity is not a contractor under this subsection (1)(c) if the person, firm, corporation, or other entity contracts with a registered general contractor and does not superintend the work.(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and industries or designated representative employed by the department.(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations require the use of more than one building trade or craft upon a single job or project or under a single building permit. A general contractor also includes one who superintends, or consults on, in whole or in part, work falling within the definition of a contractor.(6) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the department to notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter has been filed against them.(7) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.(8) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.(9) "Registration suspension" means either an automatic suspension as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance with this chapter.(10) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons owning or leasing real property:(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any construction; or(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any construction.(11) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.27.225, 18.27.230, and 18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the United States mail to the last known address provided to the department.(12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not fall within the definition of "general contractor". A specialty contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to the specialty contractor's work.(13) "Substantial completion" means the same as "substantial completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.(14) "Successor" means an applicant operating with all or part of the assets of another entity previously registered under this chapter, where the applicant is under substantially common ownership, management, or control of the other entity.(15) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for 30 or fewer days.(16) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or final tax warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment, court approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.(17) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration database, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.Sec. 2. RCW 18.27.060 and 2020 c 153 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A certificate of registration shall be valid for two years and shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the registration requirements of this chapter.(2) If the department approves an application, it shall issue a certificate of registration to the applicant.(3) If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an unsatisfied judgment against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's insurance policy is canceled, the contractor's registration shall be automatically suspended on the effective date of the impairment or cancellation. The department shall ((mail notice of the suspension to the contractor's address on the certificate of registration within two days after suspension using a method by which the mailing))notify the contractor of the suspension within two days after suspension using an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the contractor the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(4) Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department receives the required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if sent by certified mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The receipt or proof of delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of renewed registration until he or she receives verification from the department.(5) The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration of a contractor who has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate of registration shall not be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to the department a release from the department of social and health services stating that he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the suspension.Sec. 3. RCW 18.27.230 and 2011 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The department may issue a notice of infraction if the department reasonably believes that the contractor has committed an infraction under this chapter. A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the contractor named in the notice by the department's compliance inspectors or service can be made using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed directed to the contractor named in the notice of infraction at the contractor's last known address of record. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the contractor the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. If the contractor named in the notice of infraction is a firm or corporation, the notice may be personally served on any employee of the firm or corporation. If a notice of infraction is personally served upon an employee of a firm or corporation, the department shall send a copy of the notice using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the contractor if the department is able to obtain the contractor's address.Sec. 4. RCW 18.106.100 and 2020 c 153 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may revoke or suspend a certificate of competency, license, or endorsement for any of the following reasons:(a) The certificate, license, or endorsement was obtained through error or fraud;(b) The certificate, license, or endorsement holder is judged to be incompetent to carry on the trade of plumbing as a journey level plumber, specialty plumber, or residential service plumber;(c) The certificate, license, or endorsement holder has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter.(2) Before a certificate of competency, license, or endorsement is revoked or suspended, the department shall send ((written)) notice using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the certificate holder's last known address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the certificate holder the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The notice must list the allegations against the certificate holder and give him or her the opportunity to request a hearing before the advisory board. At the hearing, the department and the certificate holder have opportunity to produce witnesses and give testimony. The hearing must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall render its decision based upon the testimony and evidence presented and shall notify the parties immediately upon reaching its decision. A majority of the board is necessary to render a decision.(3) The department may deny renewal of a certificate of competency, license, or endorsement issued under this chapter if the applicant owes outstanding penalties for a final judgment under this chapter. The department shall notify the applicant of the denial using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the address on the application. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the applicant the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The applicant may appeal the denial within ((twenty))20 days by filing a notice of appeal with the department accompanied by a certified check for ((two hundred dollars))$200 which shall be returned to the applicant if the decision of the department is not upheld by the hearings officer. The office of administrative hearings shall conduct the hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the hearings officer sustains the decision of the department, the ((two hundred dollars))$200 must be applied to the cost of the hearing.Sec. 5. RCW 18.106.180 and 2020 c 153 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as specified in RCW 18.106.020 if:(a) A person who is doing plumbing work or who is offering to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of:(i) Having a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter, or being supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit; and(ii) Until January 1, 2021, being registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW, or being employed by a person who is registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW;(b) Until January 1, 2021, a person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of being registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW;(c) After January 1, 2021, a person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of being licensed as a plumbing contractor as required under this chapter; or(d) A contractor violates RCW 18.106.320.(2) A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the person or contractor named in the notice by an authorized representative of the department or sent using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address provided to the department of the person named in the notice. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the contractor the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.Sec. 6. RCW 19.28.131 and 2014 c 190 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within ((thirty))30 calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than ((fifty dollars))$50 or more than ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed sent to the last known address of the assessed party. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Any penalty is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within ((twenty))20 days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for ((two hundred dollars))$200 or ((ten))10 percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than ((one hundred dollars))$100, which shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of ((twenty))20 days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.Sec. 7. RCW 19.28.271 and 2011 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency, a temporary permit, or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any individual to engage in the electrical construction trade or to maintain or install any electrical equipment or conductors without having in his or her possession a certificate of competency, a temporary permit, or a training certificate under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271, and photo identification. The department may establish by rule a requirement that the individual also wear and visibly display his or her certificate or permit.(2) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity found in violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than ((fifty dollars))$50 or more than ((five hundred dollars))$500. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be made to the board as is provided in RCW 19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed within ((twenty))20 days after the notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the assessed party the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Any equipment maintained or installed by any person who does not possess a certificate of competency under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an electrical work permit and electrical service shall not be connected or maintained to operate the equipment. Each day that a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 is a separate violation.(3) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action brought by the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged violation arose at the request of the department if any of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 are violated.Sec. 8. RCW 19.28.341 and 2011 c 301 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter, to revoke or suspend for such a period as it determines, any electrical or telecommunications contractor license or electrical or telecommunications contractor administrator certificate issued under this chapter. The department shall notify the holder of the license or certificate of the revocation or suspension using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the license or certificate holder the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. A revocation or suspension is effective ((twenty))20 days after the holder receives the notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a revocation or suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within ((twenty))20 days after notice of the revocation or suspension is given using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed sent to the address of the holder of the license or certificate as shown on the application for the license or certificate, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of appeal with the department, accompanied by a certified check for ((two hundred dollars))$200, which shall be returned to the holder of the license or certificate if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the ((two hundred dollars))$200 shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund.(2) The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.Sec. 9. RCW 19.28.490 and 2014 c 190 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of this chapter may be assessed a penalty of not less than ((one hundred dollars))$100 or more than ((ten thousand dollars))$10,000 per violation. The department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating this chapter. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of these provisions of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation. The notice shall be sent using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the assessed party. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the assessed party the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Penalties are subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within ((twenty))20 days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for ((two hundred dollars))$200 or ((ten))10 percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than ((one hundred dollars))$100. The check shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of ((twenty))20 days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.Sec. 10. RCW 43.22.435 and 2011 c 301 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In addition to or in lieu of any other penalty applicable under this chapter, and except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000 against a contractor, firm, partnership, or corporation, that fails to obtain a permit before altering a mobile or manufactured home as required under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. However, the cumulative penalty for the same occurrence may not exceed ((five thousand dollars))$5,000.(b) The department must adopt a schedule of civil penalties giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation and the history of previous violations. Penalties for subsequent violations, not constituting the same occurrence, committed within two years of a prior violation by the same party or entity, or by an individual who was a principal or officer of the same entity, must be double the amount of the penalty for the prior violation or ((one thousand dollars))$1,000, whichever is greater.(2)(a) The department may issue a notice of correction before issuing a civil penalty assessment. The notice must include:(i) A description of the violation;(ii) A statement of what is required to correct the violation;(iii) The date by which the department requires correction to be achieved; and(iv) Notice of the individual or department office that must be contacted to obtain a permit or other compliance information.(b) A notice of correction is not a formal enforcement action, is not subject to appeal, and is a public record.(c) If the department issues a notice of correction, it shall not issue a civil penalty for the violation identified in the notice of correction unless the responsible person fails to comply with the notice.(3)(a) The department must issue ((written)) notices of civil penalties imposed under this section, with the reasons for the penalty, using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the party named in the notice. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the party the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(b) If a party desires to contest a notice of civil penalty issued under this section, the party must file a notice of appeal with the department within ((twenty))20 days of the department's ((mailing))issuance of the notice of civil penalty. An administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings will hear and determine the appeal. Appeal proceedings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An appeal of the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior court. The superior court's decision is subject only to discretionary review under the rules of appellate procedure.Sec. 11. RCW 43.22A.080 and 2023 c 36 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may revoke a certificate of manufactured home installation upon the following grounds:(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;(b) The holder of the certificate is judged to be incompetent as a result of multiple infractions of the state installation requirements, WAC 296-150I-0300 through 296-150I-0410; or(c) The holder has violated a provision of this chapter or a rule adopted to implement this chapter.(2) Before a certificate of manufactured home installation is revoked, the holder must be given ((written)) notice of the department's intention to revoke the certificate, sent using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the holder's last known address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the holder the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The notice shall enumerate the allegations against the holder, and shall give the holder the opportunity to request a hearing. At the hearing, the department and the holder may produce witnesses and give testimony. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.Sec. 12. RCW 43.22A.130 and 2011 c 301 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:An authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction if the person supervising the manufactured home installation work fails to produce evidence of having a certificate issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. A notice of infraction issued under this chapter shall be personally served on or sent using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the person named in the notice by the authorized representative. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the person named in the notice the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.Sec. 13. RCW 49.12.145 and 2023 c 114 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If a complainant files a complaint with the department of labor and industries alleging a violation of RCW 49.28.140, the department shall investigate the complaint.(b) The department may not investigate any such alleged violation of rights that occurred more than three years before the date that the complainant filed the complaint.(c) Upon the investigation of a complaint, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance, within 90 days after the date on which the department received the complaint, unless the complaint is otherwise resolved. The department may extend the period by providing advance written notice to the complainant and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the period and specifying the duration of the extension.(d) The department shall send a citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer and the complainant by service of process or using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance can be tracked, or the delivery can be confirmed to their last known addresses. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer and complainant the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(2) If the department of labor and industries investigation finds that the complainant's allegation cannot be substantiated, the department shall issue a closure letter to the complainant and the employer detailing such finding.(3)(a) If the department of labor and industries finds a violation of RCW 49.28.140, the department shall order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty.(b) Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, the maximum penalty is $1,000 for each violation, up to three violations. If there are four or more violations of this chapter for a health care facility, the employer is subject to a civil penalty of $2,500 for the fourth violation, and $5,000 for each subsequent violation.(c) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any of the requirements of RCW 49.28.140; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice, determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW, the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations, and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is immune from civil penalties under (b) of this subsection.(4) The department of labor and industries may, at any time, waive or reduce a civil penalty assessed under this section if the director of the department determines that the employer has taken corrective action to resolve the violation.(5) The department of labor and industries shall deposit all civil penalties paid under this section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.Sec. 14. RCW 49.12.390 and 2025 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) If the director, or the director's designee, finds that an employer has violated any of the requirements of RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, or a rule or order adopted or variance granted under RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, a citation and notice of assessment stating the violations shall be issued to the employer. The citation and notice of assessment shall be in writing, describing the nature of the violation including reference to the standards, rules, or orders alleged to have been violated. The citation and penalty assessment must be given to the highest management official available at the workplace or ((be mailed))sent using an electronic or nonelectronic method to the employer at the workplace. In addition, the department shall ((mail))send, using an electronic or nonelectronic method, a copy of the citation and penalty assessment to the central personnel office of the employer. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Citations issued under this section must be posted at or near the place where the violation occurred.(b) A first-time citation for failure to obtain a minor work permit or parental or school authorization, for failure to maintain records, or for a violation deemed nonserious by the department must state a specific and reasonable time for abatement of the violation to allow the employer to correct the violation. The department may waive or reduce a civil penalty assessed for a first-time violation under this subsection if the director determines that the employer has taken corrective action to resolve the violation.(c) The employer must be assessed a civil penalty as follows:(i) No less than $100 and no more than $1,000 for each violation involving failure to obtain a minor work permit or parental or school authorization, for failure to maintain records, or for each other nonserious violation;(ii) No less than $150 and no more than $1,000 for each violation involving failure to comply with hours of work requirements;(iii) No less than $300 and no more than $1,000 for each violation involving failure to comply with meal break or rest break requirements;(iv) No less than $1,000 for each violation involving failure to comply with prohibited duty requirements, variance conditions, or minimum wage requirements for minors, or for each other serious violation, except the civil penalty may be no less than $2,000 for each violation in a second or subsequent citation for any of these violations identified in this subsection (1)(c)(iv);(v) No less than $15,000 for any violation resulting in the serious physical harm of a minor, which may be doubled where the violation is a willful violation or a repeated violation; and(vi) No less than $71,000 for any violation resulting in the death of a minor, which may be doubled where the violation is a willful violation or a repeated violation.(d) If the director, or the director's designee, finds that an employer has committed a serious or repeated violation of the requirements of RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, or any rule or order adopted or variance granted under RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, the employer is subject to an additional civil penalty assessment of a maximum of $5,000 for each subsequent day the violation continues. For the purposes of this subsection (1)(d), a serious violation shall be deemed to exist if death or serious physical harm has resulted or is imminent from a condition that exists, or from one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes that have been adopted or are in use by the employer, unless the employer did not, and could not with the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.(e) The department shall consider the following factors when determining the amount of any penalty assessment under this section: (i) Whether the violation was committed willfully or the violation is a repeat violation; (ii) the size of the employer; (iii) the age of the minor; (iv) the gravity of the violation; (v) the hazards created by the violation; (vi) the penalties for comparable violations under federal law; (vii) the penalty amount necessary to deter future noncompliance; (viii) ensuring the penalty amount is consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and (ix) any other factor warranting an adjustment in the penalty as deemed appropriate by the department.(f) Beginning July 1, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the department shall adjust by rule the amounts in (c) and (d) of this subsection for inflation by calculating to the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index.(2) The employer shall pay the amount assessed under this section within 30 days of receipt of the penalty assessment or notify the director of the employer's intent to appeal the citation or the penalty assessment as provided in RCW 49.12.400. If an employer fails to pay an assessment under this section after it has become a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of the department, the director may initiate collection procedures in accordance with RCW 49.48.086.(3) In addition to any other authority provided in this section, if, upon inspection or investigation, the director, or director's designee, believes that an employer has violated RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, or a rule or order adopted or variance granted under RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123, and that the violation creates a danger from which there is a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm could result to a minor employee, the director, or director's designee, may issue an order immediately restraining the condition, practice, method, process, or means creating the danger in the workplace. An order issued under this subsection may require the employer to take steps necessary to avoid, correct, or remove the danger and may prohibit the presence of a minor in locations or under conditions where the danger exists.(4)(a) The director or the director's designee shall revoke an employer's minor work permit and prohibit the employer from obtaining a minor work permit for no less than 12 months if:(i) The employer has been issued a safety and health citation under RCW 49.17.120 containing one or more violations under RCW 49.17.180 (1), (2), (4), or (5) or any citation and notice of assessment containing one or more violations of RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123 or any applicable rule or order, where one or more of the violations caused serious physical harm or death to a minor; or(ii) An order has been issued immediately restraining an employer's condition, practice, method, process, or means in the workplace pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or RCW 49.17.130 or 49.17.170.(b) Following a revocation under this subsection, a minor work permit may not be reissued to an employer unless the employer has not been issued a citation for any violations of the provisions identified in (a)(i) of this subsection for at least 12 months.(c) This subsection does not prohibit the department from revoking, suspending, or modifying a minor work permit for any reason or cause provided for under state law or department rule or policy.(5) A person who gives advance notice, without the authority of the director, of an inspection to be conducted under this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000.(6) Penalties assessed under this section shall be paid to the director and deposited into the general fund.(7) The department shall include in its annual report submitted under RCW 49.12.180 the following information:(a) The number and type of citations and penalties issued and imposed under this section;(b) The number of and reasons for revocations of minor work permits; and(c) The number and nature of workplace injuries involving minors reviewed by the department, including whether those injuries resulted in citations or permit revocations under this section.Sec. 15. RCW 49.17.040 and 1973 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The director shall make, adopt, modify, and repeal rules and regulations governing safety and health standards for conditions of employment as authorized by this chapter after a public hearing in conformance with the administrative procedure act and the provisions of this chapter. At least ((thirty))20 days prior to such public hearing, the director shall ((cause public notice of such hearing to be made in))provide information of the public hearing and written comment period to newspapers of general circulation in this state((, of the date, time, and place of such public hearing, along with a general description of the subject matter of the proposed rules and information as to where copies of any rules and regulations proposed for adoption may be obtained and with a solicitation for recommendations in writing or suggestions for inclusion or changes in such rules to be submitted not later than five days prior to such public hearing)). Any preexisting rules adopted by the department of labor and industries relating to health and safety standards in workplaces subject to the jurisdiction of the department shall remain effective insofar as such rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.Sec. 16. RCW 49.17.140 and 2021 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If after an inspection or investigation the director or the director's authorized representative issues a citation under the authority of RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130, the department, within a reasonable time after the termination of such inspection or investigation, shall notify the employer using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed of the penalty to be assessed under the authority of RCW 49.17.180 and shall state that the employer has ((fifteen))15 working days within which to notify the director that the employer wishes to appeal the citation or assessment of penalty. If, within ((fifteen))15 working days from the communication of the notice issued by the director the employer fails to notify the director that the employer intends to appeal the citation or assessment penalty, and no notice is filed by any employee or representative of employees under subsection (4) of this section within such time, the citation and the assessment shall be deemed a final order of the department and not subject to review by any court or agency.(2) If the director has reason to believe that an employer has failed to correct a violation for which the employer was previously cited and which has become a final order, the director shall notify the employer using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed of such failure to correct the violation and of the penalty to be assessed under RCW 49.17.180 by reason of such failure, and shall state that the employer has ((fifteen))15 working days from the communication of such notification and assessment of penalty to notify the director that the employer wishes to appeal the director's notification of the assessment of penalty. If, within ((fifteen))15 working days from the receipt of notification issued by the director the employer fails to notify the director that the employer intends to appeal the notification of assessment of penalty, the notification and assessment of penalty shall be deemed a final order of the department and not subject to review by any court or agency.(3) If the director has reason to believe that an employer violated an order immediately restraining a condition, practice, method, process, or means in the workplace issued under RCW 49.17.130 or this section or a notice prohibiting the use of a machine or equipment to which a notice prohibiting such use has been attached, the director shall notify the employer using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed of such violation of the order and of the penalty to be assessed under RCW 49.17.180 by reason of violation of the order and shall state that the employer has 15 working days from the communication of such notification and assessment of penalty to notify the director that the employer wishes to appeal the director's notification of the assessment of penalty. If, within 15 working days from the receipt of notification issued by the director(([,])), the employer fails to notify the director that the employer intends to appeal the notification of assessment of penalty, the notification and assessment of penalty shall be deemed a final order of the department and not subject to review by any court or agency.(4) If any employer notifies the director that the employer intends to appeal the citation issued under either RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 or notification of the assessment of a penalty issued under subsections (1) or (2) of this section, or if, within ((fifteen))15 working days from the issuance of a citation under either RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 any employee or representative of employees files a notice with the director alleging that the period of time fixed in the citation for the abatement of the violation is unreasonable, the director may reassume jurisdiction over the entire matter, or any portion thereof upon which notice of intention to appeal has been filed with the director pursuant to this subsection. If the director reassumes jurisdiction of all or any portion of the matter upon which notice of appeal has been filed with the director, any redetermination shall be completed and corrective notices of assessment of penalty, citations, or revised periods of abatement completed within a period of ((thirty))75 working days. ((The thirty-working-day redetermination period may be extended up to forty-five additional working days upon agreement of all parties to the appeal.)) The redetermination shall then become final subject to direct appeal to the board of industrial insurance appeals within ((fifteen))15 working days of such redetermination with service of notice of appeal upon the director. In the event that the director does not reassume jurisdiction as provided in this subsection, the director shall promptly notify the state board of industrial insurance appeals of all notifications of intention to appeal any such citations, any such notices of assessment of penalty and any employee or representative of employees notice of intention to appeal the period of time fixed for abatement of a violation and in addition certify a full copy of the record in such appeal matters to the board. The director shall adopt rules of procedure for the reassumption of jurisdiction under this subsection affording employers, employees, and employee representatives notice of the reassumption of jurisdiction by the director, and an opportunity to object or support the reassumption of jurisdiction, either in writing or orally at an informal conference to be held prior to the expiration of the redetermination period. Except as otherwise provided under subsection (5) of this section, a notice of appeal filed under this section shall stay the effectiveness of any citation or notice of the assessment of a penalty pending review by the board of industrial insurance appeals, but such appeal shall not stay the effectiveness of any order of immediate restraint issued by the director under the authority of RCW 49.17.130. The board of industrial insurance appeals shall afford an opportunity for a hearing in the case of each such appellant and the department shall be represented in such hearing by the attorney general and the board shall in addition provide affected employees or authorized representatives of affected employees an opportunity to participate as parties to hearings under this subsection. The board shall thereafter make disposition of the issues in accordance with procedures relative to contested cases appealed to the state board of industrial insurance appeals.Upon application by an employer showing that a good faith effort to comply with the abatement requirements of a citation has been made and that the abatement has not been completed because of factors beyond the employer's control, the director after affording an opportunity for a hearing shall issue an order affirming or modifying the abatement requirements in such citation.(5) An appeal of any violation classified and cited as serious, willful, repeated serious violation, or failure to abate a serious violation does not stay abatement dates and requirements except as follows:(a) An employer may request a stay of abatement for any serious, willful, repeated serious violation, or failure to abate a serious violation in a notice of appeal under subsection (4) of this section;(b) When the director reassumes jurisdiction of an appeal under subsection (4) of this section, it will include the stay of abatement request. The issued redetermination decision will include a decision on the stay of abatement request. The department shall stay the abatement for any serious, willful, repeated serious violation, or failure to abate a serious violation where the department cannot determine that the preliminary evidence shows a substantial probability of death or serious physical harm to workers. The decision on stay of abatement will be final unless the employer renews the request for a stay of abatement in any direct appeal of the redetermination to the board of industrial insurance appeals under subsection (4) of this section;(c) The board of industrial insurance appeals shall adopt rules necessary for conducting an expedited review on any stay of abatement requests identified in the employer's notice of appeal, and shall issue a final decision within ((forty-five))45 working days of the board's notice of filing of appeal. This rule making shall be initiated in 2011;(d) Affected employees or their representatives must be afforded an opportunity to participate as parties in an expedited review for stay of abatement;(e) The board shall grant a stay of an abatement for a serious, willful, repeated serious violation, or failure to abate a serious violation where there is good cause for a stay unless based on the preliminary evidence it is more likely than not that a stay would result in death or serious physical harm to a worker;(f) As long as a motion to stay abatement is pending all abatement requirements will be stayed.(6) When the board of industrial insurance appeals denies a stay of abatement and abatement is required while the appeal is adjudicated, the abatement process must be the same process as the process required for abatement upon a final order.(7) The department shall develop rules necessary to implement subsections (5) and (6) of this section. In an application for a stay of abatement, the department will not grant a stay when it can determine that the preliminary evidence shows a substantial probability of death or serious physical harm to workers. The board will not grant a stay where based on the preliminary evidence it is more likely than not that a stay would result in death or serious physical harm to a worker. This rule making shall be initiated in 2011.(8) Before using an electronic method for the first time under subsections (1) through (3) of this section, the department must provide the employer the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.Sec. 17. RCW 49.17.160 and 2021 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No person shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against any employee because such employee has filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of the exercise by such employee on behalf of himself or herself or others of any right afforded by this chapter. Prohibited discrimination includes an action that would deter a reasonable employee from exercising their rights under this chapter.(2) Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this section may, within 90 days after such violation occurs, file a complaint with the director alleging such discrimination. The department may, at its discretion, extend the time period on recognized equitable principles or due to extenuating circumstances.(3) Within 90 days of the receipt of the complaint filed under this section, the director shall notify the complainant and the employer of his or her determination under subsections (4) and (5) of this section unless the matter is otherwise resolved. The department may extend the period by providing advance written notice to the complainant and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the period, and specifying the duration of the extension.(4)(a) If the director determines that the provisions of this section have been violated, the director will issue a citation and notice of assessment describing the violation to the employer, ordering all appropriate relief, and may assess a civil penalty.(b) Appropriate relief may include, but is not limited to, the following:(i) Restoring the complainant to the position of employment held by the complainant when the discrimination occurred, or restoring the complainant to an equivalent position with equivalent employment hours, work schedule, benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment; and(ii) Ordering the employer to make payable to the complainant earnings that the complainant did not receive due to the employer's discriminatory action, including interest of one percent per month on all earnings owed. The earnings and interest owed will be calculated from the first date earnings were owed to the employee.(c) A civil penalty not to exceed the maximum penalty for a serious violation under this chapter may be assessed for the first occurrence. A civil penalty not to exceed the maximum penalty for a repeat violation under this chapter may be assessed for each repeat occurrence. Civil penalties are not contingent upon relief being granted to the worker.(5) If the director finds there is insufficient evidence to determine that the provisions of this section have been violated, the director will issue a letter of closure and the employee may institute the action on his or her own behalf within 30 days of such determination. In any such action the superior court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations of subsection (1) of this section and order all appropriate relief including rehiring or reinstatement of the complainant to his or her former position with back pay.(6) The department must notify the employer and the complainant of a citation and notice of assessment issued under subsection (4) of this section using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))citation and notice of assessment can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer and the complainant the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Citations and notices of assessments shall state that the employer has 30 days within which to notify the department that the employer wishes to appeal the citation or notice of assessment, and that the complainant has 15 working days within which to notify the department that the complainant wishes to appeal the order of appropriate relief in the notice of assessment. If, within 30 days from the communication of the notice issued by the director, the employer fails to notify the department that the employer intends to appeal the citation or notice of assessment, and no notice of appeal of the order of appropriate relief is filed by the complainant within such time, the citation and notice of assessment shall be deemed a final order of the department and not subject to review by any court or agency.(7) If an employer or complainant notifies the department of an appeal, the department may reassume jurisdiction according to the timeline, process for hearing, and issuance of corrective notices of redetermination under RCW 49.17.140(4). The redetermination shall become final subject to direct appeal by an employer or complainant to the board of industrial insurance appeals within 15 working days of such redetermination with service of notice of appeal upon the director. In the event that the director does not reassume jurisdiction as provided in this subsection, the director shall promptly notify the state board of industrial insurance appeals of all notifications of intention to appeal the citation and notice of assessment and certify a full copy of the record in such appeal matters to the board. The board of industrial insurance appeals shall afford an opportunity for a hearing in the case of each such appellant and the department shall be represented in such hearing by the attorney general and the board shall in addition provide the complainant an opportunity to participate as a party to hearings of employer appeals under this subsection and provide the employer an opportunity to participate as a party to hearings of complainant appeals under this subsection. The board shall thereafter make disposition of the issues in accordance with procedures relative to contested cases appealed to the state board of industrial insurance appeals. A notice of appeal filed under this section shall stay the effectiveness of any citation or notice of assessment except orders of reinstatement pending review by the board of industrial insurance appeals.(8) Civil penalties imposed under this section shall be paid to the director for deposit in the supplemental pension fund established in RCW 51.44.033.(9) Collections of amounts owed for unpaid citations and notices of assessment will be handled pursuant to the procedures outlined in RCW 51.48.120 through 51.48.150.(10) Nothing in this section diminishes the rights, privileges, or remedies of any employee under any federal or state law or under any collective bargaining agreement. The department and complainant may pursue remedies in superior court that are outside the board of industrial insurance appeals' jurisdiction.Sec. 18. RCW 49.26.110 and 2011 c 301 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No employee or other individual is eligible to do work governed by this chapter unless issued a certificate by the department.(2) To qualify for a certificate:(a) Certified asbestos workers must have successfully completed a four-day training course. Certified asbestos supervisors must have completed a five-day training course. Training courses shall be provided or approved by the department; shall cover such topics as the health and safety aspects of the removal and encapsulation of asbestos, including but not limited to the federal and state standards regarding protective clothing, respirator use, disposal, air monitoring, cleaning, and decontamination; and shall meet such additional qualifications as may be established by the department by rule for the type of certification sought. The department may require the successful completion of annual refresher courses provided or approved by the department for continued certification as an asbestos worker or supervisor. However, the authority of the director to adopt rules implementing this section is limited to rules that are specifically required, and only to the extent specifically required, for the standards to be as stringent as the applicable federal laws governing work subject to this chapter; and(b) All applicants for certification as asbestos workers or supervisors must pass an examination in the type of certification sought which shall be provided or approved by the department.These requirements are intended to represent the minimum requirements for certification and shall not preclude contractors or employers from providing additional education or training.(3) The department shall provide for the reciprocal certification of any individual trained to engage in asbestos projects in another state when the prior training is shown to be substantially similar to the training required by the department. Nothing shall prevent the department from requiring such individuals to take an examination or refresher course before certification.(4) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a certificate, as provided under RCW 49.26.140, for failure of the holder to comply with any requirement of this chapter or chapter 49.17 RCW, or any rule adopted under those chapters, or applicable health and safety standards and regulations. In addition to any penalty imposed under RCW 49.26.016, the department may suspend or revoke any certificate issued under this chapter for a period of not less than six months upon the following grounds:(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud; or(b) The holder thereof is judged to be incompetent to carry out the work for which the certificate was issued.Before any certificate may be denied, suspended, or revoked, the holder thereof shall be given ((written)) notice of the department's intention to do so, ((mailed)) using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the holder's last known address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the holder the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The notice shall enumerate the allegations against such holder, and shall give him or her the opportunity to request a hearing before the department. At such hearing, the department and the holder shall have opportunity to produce witnesses and give testimony.(5) A denial, suspension, or revocation order may be appealed to the board of industrial insurance appeals within ((fifteen))15 working days after the denial, suspension, or revocation order is entered. The notice of appeal may be filed with the department or the board of industrial insurance appeals. The board of industrial insurance appeals shall hold the hearing in accordance with procedures established in RCW 49.17.140. Any party aggrieved by an order of the board of industrial insurance appeals may obtain superior court review in the manner provided in RCW 49.17.150.(6) Each person certified under this chapter shall display, upon the request of an authorized representative of the department, valid identification issued by the department.Sec. 19. RCW 49.40.060 and 2011 c 301 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:The director of labor and industries, or his or her deputy holding the hearing shall, after such hearing, determine the amount due from the employer to the employee, and shall make findings of fact and an award in accordance therewith, which findings and award shall be filed in the office of the director and a copy thereof ((served upon))delivered to the employer and ((upon)) the employee using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))findings and award can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed directed to their last known ((post office)) address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the director or his or her deputy must provide the employer and the employee the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.Sec. 20. RCW 49.46.370 and 2025 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any employer that coerces an employee in furtherance of the employer committing a violation of wage payment requirements as defined in chapter 49.48 RCW, condition of labor requirements as defined in chapter 49.12 RCW, or any violations under chapter 49.30 RCW, including rules issued by the department pursuant to chapter 49.30 RCW, is subject to a civil penalty under this section, in addition to any other penalty that may be imposed by the department against an employer for those violations. If an employer's violation subjects the employer to a penalty under this section and a separate penalty under RCW 49.46.100, the employer must be assessed the higher amount of the two penalties.(2) A worker who believes the worker was subject to coercion by the worker's employer based on the worker's immigration status may file a complaint with the department within 180 days of the alleged coercive action.(3)(a) The department must investigate a complaint of coercion by an employer based on immigration status.(b) Unless otherwise resolved, the department shall issue either a notice of citation assessing a penalty or a closure letter no later than 90 days after the date on which the department received the complaint.(c) The department may extend the time period by providing advance written notice to the employee and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the time period and specifying the duration of the extension.(d) The department shall send the citation assessing a penalty or closure letter to both the employer and the employee by service of process or using a method by which the ((mailing))citation assessing a penalty or closure letter can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to their last known addresses. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the employer and the employee the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(e) If the department's investigation finds that the employee's allegation cannot be substantiated, the department must issue a closure letter to the employee and employer detailing such finding.(f) If the department determines the employer violated this section, the department must assess a civil penalty for each coercive act as follows:(i) For the first violation, a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000;(ii) For the second violation, a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000; and(iii) For any subsequent violation, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.(4) Each act of coercion against each affected employee constitutes a separate violation of chapter 236, Laws of 2025.(5) The department shall deposit all civil penalties paid under this section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.(6)(a) The penalties payable pursuant to this section shall be adjusted for inflation every three years, beginning July 1, 2028, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.(7) Any personal information about the employee or the employee's family members, including names, in a complaint or investigation is confidential and may be disclosed only to the employer. Any personal information may not be disclosed to any other person or entity without the written permission of the employee.(8) If, during an investigation of any other complaint, the department discovers information that suggests an employer has coerced an employee based on immigration status, the department may investigate and take appropriate enforcement action without requiring the employee to file a new or separate complaint.(9)(a) A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation assessing a civil penalty issued by the department under this section may appeal the citation to the director by filing a notice of appeal with the director within 30 days of the department's issuance of the citation. A citation assessing a civil penalty not appealed within 30 days is final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.(b) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section stays the effectiveness of the citation assessing a civil penalty pending final review of the appeal by the director as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.(c) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director shall assign the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial order. The hearing and review procedures must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the administrative law judge of an appealed citation assessing a civil penalty shall be de novo. Any party who seeks to challenge an initial order shall file a petition for administrative review with the director within 30 days after service of the initial order. The director will conduct administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.(d) The director shall issue all final orders after appeal of the initial order. The final order of the director is subject to judicial review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.(e) Orders that are not appealed within the period specified in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.(f) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records in an investigation by the department under this section within a reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under such rules to challenge the correctness of any determination by the department of penalties assessed.(10) The collections procedures under RCW 49.48.086 apply to this section.(11) For the purposes of this section, "department" means the department of labor and industries.Sec. 21. RCW 49.48.060 and 2010 c 42 s 5 and 2010 c 8 s 12050 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage claim under RCW 49.48.040 or after receiving a wage complaint as defined in RCW 49.48.082 from an employee, it appears to the director that the employer is representing to his or her employees that he or she is able to pay wages for their services and that the employees are not being paid for their services, the director may require the employer to give a bond in such sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a definite future period not exceeding six months conduct his or her business and pay his or her employees in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.(2) If within ((ten))10 days after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the same, the director may commence a suit against the employer in the superior court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel him or her to furnish such bond or cease doing business until he or she has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount thereof to be excessive.(3) If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that the same is reasonable, necessary, or appropriate to secure the prompt payment of the wages of the employees of such employer and his or her compliance with one or more wage payment requirements as defined in RCW 49.48.082, the court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.(4) Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the employer or former employer, of such claim ((by mail))using an electronic or nonelectronic method. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer or the former employer the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the director of his or her failure to do so, within ((thirty))30 days thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be liable to a penalty of ((ten))10 percent of that portion of the claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action against the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on said wage claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action. This subsection does not apply to wage complaints made under RCW 49.48.083.Sec. 22. RCW 49.48.083 and 2023 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an employee files a wage complaint with the department, the department shall investigate the wage complaint. Unless otherwise resolved, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance no later than 60 days after the date on which the department received the wage complaint. The department may extend the time period by providing advance ((written)) notice to the employee and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the time period and specifying the duration of the extension. The department may not investigate any alleged violation of a wage payment requirement that occurred more than three years before the date that the employee filed the wage complaint. The department shall send the citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer and the employee ((by service of process or)) using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to their last known addresses. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer and the employee the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay employees all wages owed, including interest of one percent per month on all wages owed, to the employee. The wages and interest owed must be calculated from the first date wages were owed to the employee, except that the department may not order the employer to pay any wages and interest that were owed more than three years before the date the wage complaint was filed with the department.(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified in (a) of this subsection.(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement shall be not less than ((one thousand dollars))$1,000 or an amount equal to ((ten))10 percent of the total amount of unpaid wages, whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement shall be ((twenty thousand dollars))$20,000.(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice, determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW, the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations, and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against an employer under this section if the employer is not a repeat willful violator, and the director determines that the employer has provided payment to the employee of all wages that the department determined that the employer owed to the employee, including interest, within ((ten))10 business days of the employer's receipt of the citation and notice of assessment from the department.(d) The department may waive or reduce at any time a civil penalty assessed under this section if the director determines that the employer paid all wages and interest owed to an employee.(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee, of all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee, shall: (a) Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice of assessment; and (b) bar the employee from initiating or pursuing any court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this subsection.(5) The applicable statute of limitations for civil actions is tolled during the department's investigation of an employee's wage complaint against an employer. For the purposes of this subsection, the department's investigation begins on the date the employee files the wage complaint with the department and ends when: (a) The wage complaint is finally determined through a final and binding citation and notice of assessment or determination of compliance; or (b) the department notifies the employer and the employee in writing that the wage complaint has been otherwise resolved or that the employee has elected to terminate the department's administrative action under RCW 49.48.085.(6) For all wage complaints filed on or after January 1, 2024, if the department offers the employer the option to resolve a wage complaint without a citation and notice of assessment, and the employer chooses to accept the offer, any settlement must include interest of one percent per month on all amounts owed. The employee may request a waiver or reduction of interest as part of the settlement process.Sec. 23. RCW 49.60.515 and 2025 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Every hotel, motel, retail, or security guard entity, or property services contractor, who employs an isolated employee, must:(a) Adopt a sexual harassment policy;(b) Provide mandatory training to the employer's managers, supervisors, and isolated employees to:(i) Prevent sexual assault and sexual harassment in the workplace;(ii) Prevent sexual discrimination in the workplace;(iii) Educate the employer's workforce regarding protection for isolated employees who report violations of a state or federal law, rule, or regulation; and(iv) Inform isolated employees on how to use panic buttons, and inform managers and supervisors on the responsibility to respond to the use of panic buttons;(c) Provide a list of resources for the employer's isolated employees to utilize. At a minimum, the resources must include contact information of the equal employment opportunity commission, the Washington state human rights commission, and local advocacy groups focused on preventing sexual harassment and sexual assault;(d) Provide a panic button to each isolated employee. An employer must maintain a record of the purchase and utilization of panic buttons provided to its isolated employees under this section. Records must be provided to the department upon request. The department must publish advice and guidance for employers with fifty or fewer employees relating to this subsection (1)(d). This subsection (1)(d) does not apply to contracted security guard companies licensed under chapter 18.170 RCW; and(e) Document completion of the mandatory training required by this subsection and provide the documentation to the department upon request.(2)(a) A property services contractor shall submit the following to the department on an annual basis on a form or in a manner determined by the department:(i) The date of adoption of the sexual harassment policy required in subsection (1)(a) of this section;(ii) The number of managers, supervisors, and isolated employees trained as required by subsection (1)(b) of this section; and(iii) The physical address of the work location or locations at which janitorial services are provided by workers of the property services contractor, and for each location: (A) The total number of workers or contractors of the property services contractor who perform janitorial services; and (B) the total hours worked.(b) The department must make aggregate data submitted as required in this subsection (2) available upon request.(3)(a) The department must investigate if a complaint is filed with the department alleging a violation of this section or if the department has reason to believe that an employer has committed a violation of this section.(b) Except when a violation is otherwise resolved, the department must issue: (i) A citation assessing a civil penalty under (c) of this subsection if it finds a violation has occurred; or (ii) a closure letter detailing any findings if it finds that a violation cannot be substantiated. The notice of a citation or closure letter must be sent to the employer by service of process or using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))citation or closure letter can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the employer and the employee the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(c) If the department finds a violation of this section, the department may order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty of $1,000 for each willful violation. For a repeat willful violator, the citation assessing a civil penalty must be at least $2,000 for each repeat willful violation, but no greater than $10,000 for each repeat willful violation. The department may, at any time, waive or reduce a civil penalty assessed under this section if the department determines that the employer has taken corrective action to resolve the violation. Penalties collected under this section must be deposited into the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.(d) An employer who fails to comply with the department's investigation of records within a reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal to challenge the correctness of any determination by the department.(4) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.(b) "Isolated employee" means an employee who:(i)(A) Performs work in an area where two or more coworkers, supervisors, or a combination thereof are unable to immediately respond to an emergency without being summoned by the employee; or (B) spends at least 50 percent of her or his working hours without a supervisor or another coworker present; and(ii) Is employed by an employer as a janitor, security guard, hotel or motel housekeeper, or room service attendant.(c) "Employer" means any person, association, partnership, property services contractor, or public or private corporation, whether for-profit or not, who employs one or more persons.(d) "Panic button" means an emergency contact device carried by an isolated employee by which the isolated employee may summon immediate on-scene assistance from another worker, a security guard, or a representative of the employer.A panic button must:(i) Be designed to be carried by the isolated employee;(ii) Be simple to activate without delays caused by entering passwords or waiting for the system to turn on;(iii) Provide an effective signal for the circumstances when activated; and(iv) Be able to summon immediate assistance and allow responders to accurately identify the isolated employee's location.(e) "Property services contractor" means any person or entity that employs workers: (i) To perform labor for another person to provide commercial janitorial services; or (ii) on behalf of an employer to provide commercial janitorial services. "Property services contractor" does not mean the employment security department or individuals who perform labor under an agreement for exchanging their own labor or services with each other, provided the work is performed on land owned or leased by the individuals.(f) "Repeat willful violator" means any employer that has been the subject of a final and binding citation for a willful violation of one or more requirements under this section and all applicable rules, within three years of the date of issuance of the most recent citation for a willful violation of one or more requirements.(g) "Security guard" means an individual who is principally employed as, or typically referred to as, a security officer or guard, regardless of whether the individual is employed by a private security company or a single employer or whether the individual is required to be licensed under chapter 18.170 RCW.(h) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute.(5) The department must adopt rules for purposes of implementing and enforcing this section including, but not limited to, rules concerning the collection of civil penalties and establishing the processes for appeals of citations issued under this section in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.Sec. 24. RCW 49.84.045 and 2023 c 306 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) An employee may file a complaint with the department alleging a violation under this chapter or applicable rules, except for violations and enforcement of RCW 49.84.032 and 49.84.040. The department must investigate the complaint.(b) The department may not investigate any such alleged violation of rights that occurred more than three years before the date that the employee filed the complaint.(c) If an employee files a timely complaint with the department, the department must investigate the complaint and issue either a citation and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance within 90 days after the date on which the department received the complaint, unless the complaint is otherwise resolved. The department may extend the period by providing advance ((written)) notice to the employee and the employer setting forth good cause for an extension of the period and specifying the duration of the extension.(d) The department must send the citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer and the employee by service of process or using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))citation and notice of assessment or the determination of compliance can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to their last known addresses. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer and the employee the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(2) If the department's investigation finds that the employee's allegation cannot be substantiated, the department must issue a determination of compliance to the employee and the employer detailing such finding.(3) The director may initiate an investigation without an employee's complaint to ensure compliance with this chapter.(4) The department may request an employer perform a self-audit of any records relating to chapter 306, Laws of 2023, which must be provided within a reasonable time. Reasonable timelines will be specified in the self-audit request. The department must determine reasonable time based on the number of affected employees and the period of time covered by the self-audit. The records examined by the employer in order to perform the self-audit must be made available to the department upon request.(5) Upon the department's request, an employer must notify affected employees in writing that the department is conducting an investigation. The department may require the employer to include a general description of each investigation as part of the notification, including the allegations and whether the notified employee may be affected. The employer may consult with the department to provide the information for the description of the notification or investigation.(6) If the department determines that the employer has violated a requirement of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, the department also may order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty of not less than $1,000. The first violation may not exceed $1,000. The department may, at any time, waive or reduce any civil penalty assessed against an employer under this section if the department determines that the employer has taken corrective action to remedy a violation. The department must adopt rules creating a schedule to enhance penalties, not to exceed $10,000 per violation, based on repeat violations by the employer. Civil penalties must be collected by the department and deposited into the supplemental pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.(7) Except as provided under subsection (1) of this section, an employer who is found to have violated a requirement of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter resulting in a rest or meal period violation, must pay the employee one additional hour of pay at the employee's regular rate of pay for each day there is a violation.(8) Upon receiving a complaint, the department may request or subpoena the records of the warehouse distribution center.(9) For enforcement actions under this section, if any person fails to pay an assessment under this chapter, or under any rule under this chapter, after it has become a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of the agency, the director may initiate collection procedures in accordance with the collection procedures under RCW 49.48.086.(10) If the department finds that a quota violates chapter 306, Laws of 2023, the department may order the employer to review and provide a corrected written quota to the affected employee or employees within 15 calendar days and place a letter in the employee's personnel file to acknowledge the correction. If the employer fails to do so, the employer may be subject to the penalties under subsection (6) of this section and associated rules.(11) In addition to any enforcement authority provided in this chapter or applicable rules, the department may enforce any violation under this chapter or applicable rules, except for violations and enforcement of RCW 49.84.032, by filing an action in the superior court for the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. If the department prevails, it is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs, in the amount to be determined by the court.Sec. 25. RCW 51.04.082 and 2011 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Any notice or order required by this title to be ((mailed))sent to any employer may be served in the manner prescribed by law for personal service of summons and complaint in the commencement of actions in the superior courts of the state, but if the notice or order is mailed, it shall be addressed to the address of the employer as shown by the records of the department, or, if no such address is shown, to such address as the department is able to ascertain by reasonable effort. ((If requested by the employer,))The department may send any notice or order ((may be sent))to an employer by secure electronic means ((except orders communicating the closure of a claim)). Before using an electronic method for the first time for any notice or order under this title, the department must provide the employer the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. Correspondence and notices sent electronically are considered received on the date sent by the department. Failure of the employer to receive such notice or order whether served or mailed shall not release the employer from any tax or any increases or penalties thereon.Sec. 26. RCW 51.12.120 and 2023 c 88 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a worker, while working outside the territorial limits of this state, suffers an injury on account of which he or she, or his or her beneficiaries, would have been entitled to compensation under this title had the injury occurred within this state, the worker, or his or her beneficiaries, shall be entitled to compensation under this title if at the time of the injury:(a) His or her employment is principally localized in this state; or(b) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this state for employment not principally localized in any state; or(c) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this state for employment principally localized in another state whose workers' compensation law is not applicable to his or her employer; or(d) He or she is working under a contract of hire made in this state for employment outside the United States and Canada.(2) The payment or award of compensation or other recoveries, including settlement proceeds, under the workers' compensation law of another state, territory, province, or foreign nation to a worker or his or her beneficiaries otherwise entitled on account of such injury to compensation under this title shall not be a bar to a claim for compensation under this title if that claim under this title is timely filed. If compensation is paid or awarded under this title, the total amount of compensation or other recoveries, including settlement proceeds, paid or awarded the worker or beneficiary under such other workers' compensation law shall be credited against the compensation due the worker or beneficiary under this title.(3)(a) An employer not domiciled in this state who is employing workers in this state in work for which the employer must be registered under chapter 18.27 RCW, licensed under chapter 18.106 RCW, licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW, or prequalified under RCW 47.28.070, must secure the payment of compensation under this title by:(i) Insuring the employer's workers' compensation obligation under this title with the department;(ii) Being qualified as a self-insurer under this title; or(iii) For employers domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an agreement entered into under subsection (7) of this section, as permitted by the agreement, filing with the department a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the employer's state or province of domicile certifying that the employer has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's workers' compensation law.(b) The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.(4) If a worker or beneficiary is entitled to compensation under this title by reason of an injury sustained in this state while in the employ of an employer who is domiciled in another state or province of Canada and the employer:(a) Is not subject to subsection (3) of this section and has neither opened an account with the department nor qualified as a self-insurer under this title, the employer or his or her insurance carrier shall file with the director a certificate issued by the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the state of the employer's domicile, certifying that the employer has secured the payment of compensation under the workers' compensation law of the other state and that with respect to the injury the worker or beneficiary is entitled to the benefits provided under the other state's law.(b) Has filed a certificate under subsection (3)(a)(iii) of this section or (a) of this subsection (4):(i) The filing of the certificate constitutes appointment by the employer or his or her insurance carrier of the director as its agent for acceptance of the service of process in any proceeding brought by any claimant to enforce rights under this title;(ii) The director shall send to such employer or his or her insurance carrier, ((by registered or certified mail))using an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the address shown on such certificate, a true copy of any notice of claim or other process served on the director by the claimant in any proceeding brought to enforce rights under this title. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the employer or his or her insurance carrier the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method;(iii) If the employer is a self-insurer under the workers' compensation law of the other state or province of Canada, the employer shall, upon submission of evidence or security, satisfactory to the director, of his or her ability to meet his or her liability to the claimant under this title, be deemed to be a qualified self-insurer under this title; and(iv) If the employer's liability under the workers' compensation law of the other state or province of Canada is insured:(A) The employer's carrier, as to such claimant only, shall be deemed to be subject to this title. However, unless the insurer's contract with the employer requires the insurer to pay an amount equivalent to the compensation benefits provided by this title, the insurer's liability for compensation shall not exceed the insurer's liability under the workers' compensation law of the other state or province; and(B) If the total amount for which the employer's insurer is liable under (b)(iv)(A) of this subsection is less than the total of the compensation to which the claimant is entitled under this title, the director may require the employer to file security satisfactory to the director to secure the payment of compensation under this title.(c) If subject to subsection (3) of this section, has not complied with subsection (3) of this section or, if not subject to subsection (3) of this section, has neither qualified as a self-insurer nor secured insurance coverage under the workers' compensation law of another state or province of Canada, the claimant shall be paid compensation by the department and the employer shall have the same rights and obligations, and is subject to the same penalties, as other employers subject to this title.(5) As used in this section:(a) A person's employment is principally localized in this or another state when: (i) His or her employer has a place of business in this or the other state and he or she regularly works at or from the place of business; or (ii) if (a)(i) of this subsection is not applicable, he or she is domiciled in and spends a substantial part of his or her working time in the service of his or her employer in this or the other state;(b) "Workers' compensation law" includes "occupational disease law" for the purposes of this section.(6) A worker whose duties require him or her to travel regularly in the service of his or her employer in this and one or more other states may agree in writing with his or her employer that his or her employment is principally localized in this or another state, and, unless the other state refuses jurisdiction, the agreement shall govern as to any injury occurring after the effective date of the agreement.(7) The director is authorized to enter into agreements with the appropriate agencies of other states and provinces of Canada that administer their workers' compensation law with respect to conflicts of jurisdiction and the assumption of jurisdiction in cases where the contract of employment arises in one state or province and the injury occurs in another. If the other state's or province's law requires Washington employers to secure the payment of compensation under the other state's or province's workers' compensation laws for work performed in that state or province, then employers domiciled in that state or province must purchase compensation covering their workers engaged in that work in this state under this state's industrial insurance law. When an agreement under this subsection has been executed and adopted as a rule of the department under chapter 34.05 RCW, it binds all employers and workers subject to this title and the jurisdiction of this title is governed by this rule.(8) Washington employers who are not self-insured under chapter 51.14 RCW shall obtain workers' compensation coverage from the state fund for temporary and incidental work performed on jobs or at jobsites in another state by their Washington workers. The department is authorized to adopt rules governing premium liability and reporting requirements for hours of work in excess of temporary and incidental as defined in this chapter.(9) "Temporary and incidental" means work performed by Washington employers on jobs or at jobsites in another state for 30 or fewer consecutive or nonconsecutive full or partial days within a calendar year. Temporary and incidental days are considered on a per state basis.(10) By December 1, 2011, the department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory committee on the effect of this section on the revenue and costs to the state fund.Sec. 27. RCW 51.14.060 and 2010 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director may, in cases of default upon any obligation under this title by the self-insurer, after ((ten))10 days' notice ((by certified mail))sent using an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the defaulting self-insurer of the intention to do so, bring suit upon such bond or collect the interest and principal of any of the securities as they may become due or sell the securities or any of them as may be required or apply the money deposited, all in order to pay compensation and discharge the obligations of the defaulting self-insurer under this title. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this subsection, the department must provide the self-insurer the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(2) The director shall be authorized to fulfill the defaulting self-insured employer's obligations under this title from the defaulting self-insured employer's deposit or from other funds provided under this title for the satisfaction of claims against the defaulting self-insured employer. The defaulting self-insured employer is liable to and shall reimburse the director for the amounts necessary to fulfill the obligations of the defaulting self-insured employer that are in excess of the amounts received by the director from any bond filed, or securities or money deposited, by the defaulting self-insured employer pursuant to this chapter (( 51.14 RCW)). The amounts to be reimbursed shall include all amounts paid or payable as compensation under this title together with administrative costs, including attorneys' fees, and shall be considered taxes due the state of Washington.(3) The department shall transfer the balance of any defaulted self-insured employer's deposit as required by RCW 51.14.020 into the insolvency trust fund when the following have occurred:(a) All claims against the defaulted self-insured employer are closed; and(b) The self-insured employer has been in default for ((ten))10 years.Sec. 28. RCW 51.24.060 and 2011 c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the injured worker or beneficiary elects to seek damages from the third person, any recovery made shall be distributed as follows:(a) The costs and reasonable attorneys' fees shall be paid proportionately by the injured worker or beneficiary and the department and/or self-insurer: PROVIDED, That the department and/or self-insurer may require court approval of costs and attorneys' fees or may petition a court for determination of the reasonableness of costs and attorneys' fees;(b) The injured worker or beneficiary shall be paid ((twenty-five))25 percent of the balance of the award: PROVIDED, That in the event of a compromise and settlement by the parties, the injured worker or beneficiary may agree to a sum less than ((twenty-five))25 percent;(c) The department and/or self-insurer shall be paid the balance of the recovery made, but only to the extent necessary to reimburse the department and/or self-insurer for benefits paid;(i) The department and/or self-insurer shall bear its proportionate share of the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the worker or beneficiary to the extent of the benefits paid under this title: PROVIDED, That the department's and/or self-insurer's proportionate share shall not exceed ((one hundred))100 percent of the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees;(ii) The department's and/or self-insurer's proportionate share of the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees shall be determined by dividing the gross recovery amount into the benefits paid amount and multiplying this percentage times the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the worker or beneficiary;(iii) The department's and/or self-insurer's reimbursement share shall be determined by subtracting their proportionate share of the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees from the benefits paid amount;(d) Any remaining balance shall be paid to the injured worker or beneficiary; and(e) Thereafter no payment shall be made to or on behalf of a worker or beneficiary by the department and/or self-insurer for such injury until the amount of any further compensation and benefits shall equal any such remaining balance minus the department's and/or self-insurer's proportionate share of the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees in regards to the remaining balance. This proportionate share shall be determined by dividing the gross recovery amount into the remaining balance amount and multiplying this percentage times the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the worker or beneficiary. Thereafter, such benefits shall be paid by the department and/or self-insurer to or on behalf of the worker or beneficiary as though no recovery had been made from a third person.(2) The recovery made shall be subject to a lien by the department and/or self-insurer for its share under this section.(3) The department or self-insurer has sole discretion to compromise the amount of its lien. In deciding whether or to what extent to compromise its lien, the department or self-insurer shall consider at least the following:(a) The likelihood of collection of the award or settlement as may be affected by insurance coverage, solvency, or other factors relating to the third person;(b) Factual and legal issues of liability as between the injured worker or beneficiary and the third person. Such issues include, but are not limited to, possible contributory negligence and novel theories of liability; and(c) Problems of proof faced in obtaining the award or settlement.(4) In an action under this section, the self-insurer may act on behalf and for the benefit of the department to the extent of any compensation and benefits paid or payable from state funds.(5) It shall be the duty of the person to whom any recovery is paid before distribution under this section to advise the department or self-insurer of the fact and amount of such recovery, the costs and reasonable attorneys' fees associated with the recovery, and to distribute the recovery in compliance with this section.(6) The distribution of any recovery made by award or settlement of the third party action shall be confirmed by department order((, served by a method for which receipt can be confirmed or tracked, and shall be subject to chapter 51.52 RCW))pursuant to RCW 51.52.050. In the event the order of distribution becomes final under chapter 51.52 RCW, the director or the director's designee may file with the clerk of any county within the state a warrant in the amount of the sum representing the unpaid lien plus interest accruing from the date the order became final. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for such warrant and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of such worker or beneficiary mentioned in the warrant, the amount of the unpaid lien plus interest accrued and the date when the warrant was filed. The amount of such warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to and interest in all real and personal property of the injured worker or beneficiary against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of such clerk. The sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court. Such warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the department in the manner provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10), which shall be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of such warrant shall be mailed to the injured worker or beneficiary within three days of filing with the clerk.(7) The director, or the director's designee, may issue to any person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of any kind if he or she has reason to believe that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property which is due, owing, or belonging to any worker or beneficiary upon whom a warrant has been served by the department for payments due to the state fund. The notice and order to withhold and deliver shall be served by the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy; by a method for which receipt can be confirmed or tracked; or by any authorized representatives of the director. Any person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the notice within ((twenty))20 days exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order to withhold and deliver. In the event there is in the possession of the party named and served with such notice and order, any property which may be subject to the claim of the department, such property shall be delivered forthwith to the director or the director's authorized representative upon demand. If the party served and named in the notice and order fails to answer the notice and order within the time prescribed in this section, the court may, after the time to answer such order has expired, render judgment by default against the party named in the notice for the full amount claimed by the director in the notice together with costs. In the event that a notice to withhold and deliver is served upon an employer and the property found to be subject thereto is wages, the employer may assert in the answer to all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner may be entitled.Sec. 29. RCW 51.24.070 and 1984 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department or self-insurer may require the injured worker or beneficiary to exercise the right of election under this chapter by ((serving a written demand by registered mail, certified mail, or personal service on the worker or beneficiary))serving a written demand by mail, or if the injured worker or beneficiary chooses, the department may send by secure electronic means.(2) Unless an election is made within ((sixty))60 days of the receipt of the demand, and unless an action is instituted or settled within the time granted by the department or self-insurer, the injured worker or beneficiary is deemed to have assigned the action to the department or self-insurer. The department or self-insurer shall allow the worker or beneficiary at least ((ninety))90 days from the election to institute or settle the action. When a beneficiary is a minor child the demand shall be served upon the legal custodian or guardian of such beneficiary.(3) If an action which has been filed is not diligently prosecuted, the department or self-insurer may petition the court in which the action is pending for an order assigning the cause of action to the department or self-insurer. Upon a sufficient showing of a lack of diligent prosecution the court in its discretion may issue the order.(4) If the department or self-insurer has taken an assignment of the third party cause of action under subsection (2) of this section, the injured worker or beneficiary may, at the discretion of the department or self-insurer, exercise a right of reelection and assume the cause of action subject to reimbursement of litigation expenses incurred by the department or self-insurer.Sec. 30. RCW 51.24.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 85 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the injured worker or beneficiary elects to seek damages from the third person, notice of the election must be given to the department or self-insurer((. The notice shall be by registered mail, certified mail, or personal service))using an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. If an action is filed by the injured worker or beneficiary, a copy of the complaint must be ((sent by registered mail to the department or self-insurer))mailed to the department or self-insurer using an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed.(2) A return showing service of the notice on the department or self-insurer shall be filed with the court but shall not be part of the record except as necessary to give notice to the defendant of the lien imposed by RCW 51.24.060(2).Sec. 31. RCW 51.32.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:Claims of injured workers of employers who have secured the payment of compensation by insuring with the department shall be promptly acted upon by the department. Where temporary disability compensation is payable, the first payment thereof shall be ((mailed))sent within ((fourteen))14 days after receipt of the claim at the department's offices in Olympia and shall continue at regular semimonthly intervals. The payment of this or any other benefits under this title, prior to the entry of an order by the department in accordance with RCW 51.52.050 as now or hereafter amended, shall be not considered a binding determination of the obligations of the department under this title. The acceptance of compensation by the worker or his or her beneficiaries prior to such order shall likewise not be considered a binding determination of their rights under this title.Sec. 32. RCW 51.48.180 and 1986 c 9 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:If the amount of taxes, interest, or penalties assessed by the director or the director's designee by order and notice of assessment pursuant to RCW 51.48.170 is not paid within ((ten))10 days after the service or ((mailing))electronic or nonelectronic mailing of the order and notice of assessment, the director or the director's designee may collect the amount stated in said assessment by the distraint, seizure, and sale of the property, goods, chattels, and effects of the delinquent employer. There shall be exempt from distraint and sale under this section such goods and property as are exempt from execution under the laws of this state.Sec. 33. RCW 51.52.050 and 2019 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award, it shall promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected thereby, with a copy ((thereof by mail, or if the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected thereby chooses, the department may send correspondence and other legal notices by secure electronic means except for orders communicating the closure of a claim))thereof by mail, or if the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected thereby chooses, the department may send correspondence and other legal notices by secure electronic means.(b) In the event the department has made an order communicating the closure of a claim of a self-insured employer, the self-insured employer may serve the department order provided the self-insured employer does so using a separate, secure, and verifiable ((nonelectronic)) means of delivery in accordance with the requirements for the department's service in (a) of this subsection and includes the department prescribed notice explaining the contents of the order and any protest or appeal rights. The service by the self-insured employer is a communication for the purposes of filing an appeal under RCW 51.52.060.((Persons who choose to))(c) Workers, beneficiaries, employers, or other persons affected thereby who receive correspondence and other legal notices electronically shall be provided information to assist them in ensuring all electronic documents and communications are received. Correspondence and notices must be addressed to ((such a person at his or her last known postal or electronic))workers, beneficiaries, employers, or other persons affected thereby addressed to the address as shown by the records of the department. Correspondence and notices sent electronically are considered received on the date sent by the department. ((The copy, in case the same))(d) When the department's order, decision, or award is a final order, decision, or award, the served copy shall bear on the same side of the same page on which is found the amount of the award, a statement, set in black faced type of at least ((ten))10 point body or size, that such final order, decision, or award shall become final within ((sixty))60 days from the date the order is communicated through nonelectronic methods and 65 days from the date the order is communicated through electronic methods to the parties unless a written request for reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia. However, a department order or decision making demand, whether with or without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health services rendered to an industrially injured worker, shall state that such order or decision shall become final within ((twenty))20 days from the date the order or decision is communicated to the parties unless a written request for reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia.(2)(a) Whenever the department has taken any action or made any decision relating to any phase of the administration of this title the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may request reconsideration of the department, or may appeal to the board. In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the relief sought in such appeal.(b) An order by the department awarding benefits shall become effective and benefits due on the date issued. Subject to (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, if the department order is appealed the order shall not be stayed pending a final decision on the merits unless ordered by the board. Upon issuance of the order granting the appeal, the board will provide the worker with notice concerning the potential of an overpayment of benefits paid pending the outcome of the appeal and the requirements for interest on unpaid benefits pursuant to RCW 51.52.135. A worker may request that benefits cease pending appeal at any time following the employer's motion for stay or the board's order granting appeal. The request must be submitted in writing to the employer, the board, and the department. Any employer may move for a stay of the order on appeal, in whole or in part. The motion must be filed within ((fifteen))15 days of the order granting appeal. The board shall conduct an expedited review of the claim file provided by the department as it existed on the date of the department order. The board shall issue a final decision within ((twenty-five))25 days of the filing of the motion for stay or the order granting appeal, whichever is later. The board's final decision may be appealed to superior court in accordance with RCW 51.52.110. The board shall grant a motion to stay if the moving party demonstrates that it is more likely than not to prevail on the facts as they existed at the time of the order on appeal. The board shall not consider the likelihood of recoupment of benefits as a basis to grant or deny a motion to stay. If a self-insured employer prevails on the merits, any benefits paid may be recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.(i) If upon reconsideration requested by a worker or medical provider, the department has ordered an increase in a permanent partial disability award from the amount reflected in an earlier order, the award reflected in the earlier order shall not be stayed pending a final decision on the merits. However, the increase is stayed without further action by the board pending a final decision on the merits.(ii) If any party appeals an order establishing a worker's wages or the compensation rate at which a worker will be paid temporary or permanent total disability or loss of earning power benefits, the worker shall receive payment pending a final decision on the merits based on the following:(A) When the employer is self-insured, the wage calculation or compensation rate the employer most recently submitted to the department; or(B) When the employer is insured through the state fund, the highest wage amount or compensation rate uncontested by the parties.Payment of benefits or consideration of wages at a rate that is higher than that specified in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection is stayed without further action by the board pending a final decision on the merits.(c) In an appeal from an order of the department that alleges willful misrepresentation, the department or self-insured employer shall initially introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any such person aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may thereafter appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this chapter.Sec. 34. RCW 70.79.320 and 2011 c 301 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation to operate under pressure in this state a boiler or unfired pressure vessel, to which this chapter applies, without a valid inspection certificate as provided for in this chapter.(2) The department may assess a penalty against a person violating a provision of this chapter. The penalty shall be not more than ((five hundred dollars))$500. Each day that the violation continues is a separate violation and is subject to a separate penalty.(3) The department may not assess a penalty until it adopts rules describing the method it will use to calculate penalties for various violations.(4) The department shall notify the violator of its action, and the reasons for its action((, in writing)). The department shall send the notice using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the violator that a hearing may be requested under RCW 70.79.361. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the violator the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The hearing shall not stay the effect of the penalty.Sec. 35. RCW 70.87.125 and 2011 c 301 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A license issued under this chapter may be suspended, revoked, or subject to civil penalty by the department upon verification that any one or more of the following reasons exist:(a) Any false statement as to a material matter in the application;(b) Fraud, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing a license;(c) Failure to notify the department and the owner or lessee of a conveyance or related mechanisms of any condition not in compliance with this chapter;(d) A violation of any provisions of this chapter; and(e) If the elevator contractor does not employ an individual designated as the primary point of contact with the department and who has successfully completed the elevator contractor examination. In the case of a separation of employment, termination of this relationship or designation, or death of the designated individual, the elevator contractor must, within ((ninety))90 days, designate a new individual who has successfully completed the elevator contractor examination.(2) The department may suspend or revoke a permit if:(a) The permit was obtained through fraud or by error if, in the absence of error, the department would not have issued the permit;(b) The conveyance for which the permit was issued has not been worked on in accordance with this chapter; or(c) The conveyance has become unsafe.(3) The department shall suspend any license issued under this chapter promptly after receiving notice from the department of social and health services that the holder of the license has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other license requirements during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.(4) The department shall notify in writing the owner, licensee, or person performing conveyance work, of its action and the reason for the action. The department shall send the notice using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the owner or person. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the owner, licensee, or person performing conveyance work the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The notice shall inform the owner, licensee, or person performing conveyance work that a hearing may be requested pursuant to RCW 70.87.170.(5)(a) If the department has suspended or revoked a permit or license because of fraud or error, and a hearing is requested, the suspension or revocation shall be stayed until the hearing is concluded and a decision is issued.(b) If the department has revoked or suspended a license because the licensee performing the work covered by this chapter is working in a manner that does not effectively prevent injuries or deaths or protect employees and the public from unsafe conditions as is required by this chapter, the suspension or revocation is effective immediately and shall not be stayed by a request for a hearing.(c) If the department has revoked or suspended a permit because the conveyance is unsafe or the conveyance work is not permitted and performed in accordance with this chapter, the suspension or revocation is effective immediately and shall not be stayed by a request for a hearing.(6) The department must remove a suspension or reinstate a revoked license if the licensee pays all the assessed civil penalties and is able to demonstrate to the department that the licensee has met all the qualifications established by this chapter.(7) The department shall remove a suspension or reinstate a revoked permit if a conveyance is repaired or modified to bring it into compliance with this chapter.Sec. 36. RCW 70.87.185 and 2011 c 301 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may assess a penalty against a person violating a provision of this chapter. The penalty shall be not more than ((five hundred dollars))$500. Each day that the violation continues is a separate violation and is subject to a separate penalty.(2) The department may not assess a penalty until it adopts rules describing the method it will use to calculate penalties for various violations.(3) The department shall notify the violator of its action, and the reasons for its action((, in writing)). The department shall send the notice using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the violator's last known address. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the violator the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method. The notice shall inform the violator that a hearing may be requested under RCW 70.87.170. The hearing shall not stay the effect of the penalty.Sec. 37. RCW 70.87.205 and 2011 c 301 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Disputes arising under RCW 70.87.200(2) shall be resolved by arbitration. The request shall be sent using ((a))an electronic or nonelectronic method by which the ((mailing))notice can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed. Before using an electronic method for the first time under this section, the department must provide the parties the option to receive communication through a nonelectronic method.(2) The department shall appoint one arbitrator; the municipality shall appoint one arbitrator; and the arbitrators chosen by the department and the municipality shall appoint the third arbitrator. If the two arbitrators cannot agree on the third arbitrator, the presiding judge of the Thurston county superior court, or his or her designee, shall appoint the third arbitrator.(3) The arbitration shall be held pursuant to the procedures in chapter 7.04A RCW, except that RCW 7.04A.280(1)(f) shall not apply. The decision of the arbitrators is final and binding on the parties. Neither party may appeal a decision to any court.(4) A party may petition the Thurston county superior court to enforce a decision of the arbitrators.--- END ---